hu: Sátor szezonalitása: 1 évszakos (nyári); 2 évszakos; 3 évszakos; 4 évszakos; 5 évszakos (expedíciós); Négyévszakos; Négyévszakos (expedíciós); Egyéb
ro-RO: Sezonalitatea cortului: 1 sezon (Vară); 2 sezoane; 3 sezoane; 4 sezoane; 5 sezoane (Expediție); Pentru toate sezoanele; Pentru toate sezoanele (Expediție); Altele
tr: Çadır mevsim derecesi: 1 mevsim (Yaz); 2 mevsim; 3 mevsim; 4 mevsim; 5 mevsim (Keşif); Dört mevsim; Dört mevsim (Keşif); Diğer
pt-BR: Barraca classificação de estação: 1 estação (verão); 2 estações; 3 estações; 4 estações; 5 estações (expedição); Todas as estações; Todas as estações (expedição); Outros
th: การจัดอันดับฤดูกาลกางเต็นท์: 1 ฤดู (ฤดูร้อน); 2 ฤดู; 3 ฤดู; 4 ฤดู; 5 ฤดู (สำหรับการสำรวจ); ทุกฤดู; ทุกฤดู (สำหรับการสำรวจ); อื่นๆ
ko: 텐트 계절 등급: 1계절용(여름); 2계절용; 3계절용; 4계절용; 5계절용(원정용); 사계절용; 사계절용(원정용); 기타
da: Sæsonvurdering for telt: 1-sæsons (sommer); 2-sæsons; 3-sæsons; 4-sæsons; 5-sæsons (ekspedition); Helårs; Helårs (ekspedition); Andet
nl: Tent seizoensclassificatie: 1-seizoens (zomer); 2-seizoens; 3-seizoens; 4-seizoens; 5-seizoens (expeditie); All-season; All-season (expeditie); Overige
sv: Tältsäsongsklassning: 1-säsongs (sommar); 2-säsongs; 3-säsongs; 4-säsongs; 5-säsongs (expedition); Åretrunt; Åretrunt (expedition); Annat
sl-SI: Sezonski razred šotora: 1-sezonski (poletni); 2-sezonski; 3-sezonski; 4-sezonski; 5-sezonski (odpravniški); Vse sezonski; Vse sezonski (odpravniški); Drugo
pt-PT: Classificação sazonal da tenda: 1 estação (verão); 2 estações; 3 estações; 4 estações; 5 estações (expedição); Todas as estações; Todas as estações (expedição); Outro
pl: Ocena sezonowości namiotu: 1-sezonowy (letni); 2-sezonowy; 3-sezonowy; 4-sezonowy; 5-sezonowy (ekspedycyjny); Całoroczny; Całoroczny (ekspedycyjny); Inne
hr-HR: Ocjena sezone šatora: Za 1 sezonu (ljeto); Za 2 sezone; Za 3 sezone; Za 4 sezone; Za 5 sezona (ekspedicija); Za sve sezone; Za sve sezone (ekspedicija); Ostalo
ru: Сезонность палатки: 1-сезонная (летняя); 2-сезонная; 3-сезонная; 4-сезонная; 5-сезонная (экспедиционная); Всесезонная; Всесезонная (экспедиционная); Другое
it: Valutazione della stagione della tenda: 1 stagione (estate); 2 stagioni; 3 stagioni; 4 stagioni; 5 stagioni (spedizione); Tutte le stagioni; Tutte le stagioni (spedizione); Altro
fi: Telttakauden luokitus: Yhden vuodenajan (kesä); Kahden vuodenajan; Kolmen vuodenajan; Neljän vuodenajan; Viiden vuodenajan (retkikunta); Ympärivuotinen; Ympärivuotinen (retkikunta); Muu
sk-SK: Sezónne hodnotenie stanu: 1-sezónny (letný); 2-sezónny; 3-sezónny; 4-sezónny; 5-sezónny (expedičný); Celosezónny; Celosezónny (expedičný); Iné
lt-LT: Palapinės sezoninis įvertinimas: 1 sezono (vasarinė); 2 sezonų; 3 sezonų; 4 sezonų; 5 sezonų (ekspedicinė); Visų sezonų; Visų sezonų (ekspedicinė); Kita
es: Calificación de la temporada de tiendas de campaña: 1 estación (verano); 2 estaciones; 3 estaciones; 4 estaciones; 5 estaciones (expedición); Todas las estaciones; Todas las estaciones (expedición); Otro
el: Αξιολόγηση για την περίοδο κατασκήνωσης: 1 εποχής (Καλοκαίρι); 2 εποχών; 3 εποχών; 4 εποχών; 5 εποχών (Αποστολής); Όλων των εποχών; Όλων των εποχών (Αποστολής); Άλλο
cs: Sezónnost: 1sezónní (letní); 2sezónní; 3sezónní; 4sezónní; 5sezónní (expediční); Celoroční; Celoroční (expediční); Ostatní
bg-BG: Сезонен клас на палатка: 1 сезон (лято); 2 сезона; 3 сезона; 4 сезона; 5 сезона (експедиционна); Всесезонна; Всесезонна (експедиционна); Друго
zh-TW: 帳篷季節評級: 單季 (夏季); 兩季; 三季; 四季; 五季 (探險); 全季; 全季 (探險); 其他
nb: Teltsesongvurdering: 1-sesongs (sommer); 2-sesongs; 3-sesongs; 4-sesongs; 5-sesongs (ekspedisjon); Helårs; Helårs (ekspedisjon); Annet
de: Saisonklassifizierung des Zelts: 1-Saison (Sommer); 2-Saisons; 3-Saisons; 4-Saisons; 5-Saisons (Expedition); Ganzjährig; Ganzjährig (Expedition); Sonstige
ja: テントシーズン評価: 1 シーズン (夏); 2 シーズン; 3 シーズン; 4 シーズン; 5 シーズン (遠征用); オールシーズン; オールシーズン (遠征用); その他
vi: Xếp hạng mùa cắm trại: 1 mùa (Mùa hè); 2 mùa; 3 mùa; 4 mùa; 5 mùa (Thám hiểm); Bốn mùa; Bốn mùa (Thám hiểm); Khác
en: Tent season rating: 1-season (Summer); 2-season; 3-season; 4-season; 5-season (Expedition); All-season; All-season (Expedition); Other
fr: Indice de saisonnalité de la tente: 1 saison (été); 2 saisons; 3 saisons; 4 saisons; 5 saisons (expédition); Toutes saisons; Toutes saisons (expédition); Autre
zh-CN: 帐篷季节等级: 一季（夏季）; 两季; 三季; 四季; 五季（探险）; 全季; 全季（探险）; 其他